Utah statutes.
70A-3-204.   Indorsement.
(1)  "Indorsement" means a signature, other than that of a signer as maker,
drawer, or acceptor, that alone or accompanied by other words is made on an
instrument for the purpose of negotiating the instrument, restricting payment
of the instrument, or incurring indorser's liability on the instrument, but
regardless of the intent of the signer, a signature and its accompanying words
is an indorsement unless the accompanying words, terms of the instrument,
place of the signature, or other circumstances unambiguously indicate that the
signature was made for a purpose other than indorsement.  For the purpose of
determining whether a signature is made on an instrument, a paper affixed to
the instrument is a part of the instrument.
(2)  "Indorser" means a person who makes an indorsement.
(3)  For the purpose of determining whether the transferee of an instrument is
a holder, an indorsement that transfers a security interest in the instrument
is effective as an unqualified indorsement of the instrument.
(4)  If an instrument is payable to a holder under a name that is not the name
of the holder, indorsement may be made by the holder in the name stated in the
instrument or in the holder's name or both, but signature in both names may be
required by a person paying or taking the instrument for value or collection.
